Maryland, session 2025, HB0283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
SUBTITLE 18. SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS PILOT PROGRAM.
4–1801.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “HOME” MEANS A SINGLE–FAMILY DWELLING, SEMIDETACHED
DWELLING, MULTIFAMILY DWELLING, OR TOWNHOME.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0283*

HOUSE BILL 283
(3) “OFFICE” MEANS THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME
PREVENTION AND POLICY.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS PILOT
PROGRAM.
(5) “RESIDENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES IN A HOME IN A
DESIGNATED HIGH–CRIME AREA.
(B) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY SHALL
ESTABLISH A SAFE NEIGHBORHOODS PILOT PROGRAM TO:
(1) PURCHASE DOORBELL CAMERAS OR SECURITY SYSTEMS WITH
DOORBELL CAMERAS AND INSTALL THE CAMERAS OR SYSTEMS IN THE HOMES OF
RESIDENTS WHO APPLY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM;
(2) ENGAGE COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS AND RESIDENTS TO
PROMOTE COMMUNITY PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM;
(3) PROVIDE TRAINING FOR RESIDENTS ON THE USE OF A DOORBELL
CAMERA OR SECURITY SYSTEM WITH A DOORBELL CAMERA, INCLUDING HOW TO
ACCESS VIDEO PRODUCED BY THE CAMERA;
(4) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR RESIDENTS TO CONTACT LAW
ENFORCEMENT IN ORDER TO SUBMIT VIDEO OBTAINED BY A DOORBELL CAMERA AS
EVIDENCE; AND
(5) PROVIDE INFORMATION TO RESIDENTS ON THE PROCESS FOR THE
SUBMISSION OF VIDEO CAPTURED BY A DOORBELL CAMERA TO LAW ENFORCEMENT.
(C) THE OFFICE, IN COORDINATION WITH LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCIES, SHALL:
(1) IDENTIFY HIGH–CRIME AREAS WITHIN LOCAL COMMUNITIES IN
THE STATE;
(2) ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR RESIDENTS OF HIGH–CRIME AREAS
IDENTIFIED BY THE OFFICE TO APPLY TO PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) FACILITATE TRAINING FOR RESIDENTS ON THE USE OF DOORBELL
CAMERAS AND SECURITY SYSTEMS WITH DOORBELL CAMERAS.
(D) (1) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE OFFICE SHALL REPORT

HOUSE BILL 283 3
TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON:
(I) THE CRIME RATE WITHIN THE IDENTIFIED HIGH–CRIME
AREAS FOLLOWING THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM;
(II) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF CRIMES SOLVED WITH THE AID OF
EVIDENCE OBTAINED BY CAMERAS PROVIDED THROUGH THE PROGRAM;
(III) THE SENSE OF SECURITY AMONG RESIDENT PARTICIPANTS
OF THE PROGRAM;
(IV) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF PARTICIPANTS IN THE PROGRAM;
AND
(V) THE USEFULNESS AND VIABILITY OF THE PROGRAM BASED
ON A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS.
(2) THE OFFICE SHALL PUBLICLY POST THE REPORT REQUIRED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ON ITS WEBSITE.
(E) THE OFFICE SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION, INCLUDING REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) ENSURE THAT A DOORBELL CAMERA OR SECURITY SYSTEM WITH
A DOORBELL CAMERA THAT IS PROVIDED TO A RESIDENT OF A HIGH–CRIME AREA
INCLUDES 2 YEARS OF SERVICE AT NO COST TO THE RESIDENT;
(2) PROHIBIT A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY FROM COMPELLING A
RESIDENT TO SHARE FOOTAGE OBTAINED BY A DOORBELL CAMERA OR SECURITY
SYSTEM WITH A DOORBELL CAMERA PROVIDED THROUGH THE PROGRAM; AND
(3) INCLUDE MEASURES THAT PROTECT THE PRIVACY OF RESIDENTS
AND ENSURE THAT ANY DATA COLLECTED IS SECURELY STORED AND PROTECTED
FROM UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS OR BREACHES.
(F) BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF $5,000,000 FOR THE PROGRAM TO BE USED ONLY TO:
(1) CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) COVER EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE OFFICE THAT ARE

HOUSE BILL 283
ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE PROGRAM, INCLUDING PERSONNEL HIRED BY THE OFFICE
AND ASSIGNED TO THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of September
30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.